Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Jurisdiction over Foreign Representatives.

Sec. 13.21.055.
Jurisdiction by act of foreign personal representative.

A foreign personal representative submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the estate by (1) filing authenticated copies of appointment as provided in AS

13.21.030

, (2) receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property under AS

13.21.015

, or (3) doing any act as a personal representative in this state that would have given the state jurisdiction over the personal representative as an individual. Jurisdiction under (2) of this section is limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Sec. 13.21.060.
Jurisdiction by act of decedent.

In addition to jurisdiction conferred by AS

13.21.055

, a foreign personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that the represented decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately before death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.21.065.
Service on foreign personal representative; time allowed for appearing or responding.

Service of process may be made upon the foreign personal representative by registered or certified mail, addressed to the representative’s last reasonably ascertainable address, requesting a return receipt signed by addressee only. Notice by ordinary first-class mail is sufficient if registered or certified mail service to the addressee is unavailable. Service may be made upon a foreign personal representative in the manner in which service could have been made under other laws of this state on either the foreign personal representative or the decedent immediately before death.

If service is made upon a foreign personal representative as provided in (a) of this section, the representative shall be allowed at least 30 days within which to appear or respond.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)